Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB543.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 48.160 is amended to read as follows:
Each branch, by budget unit, shall submit in its budget recommendation a request for
funds reasonably necessary to match anticipated federal funds which may become
available during the fiscal biennium. The amount of anticipated federal funds shall also
be specified. These matching funds shall not be utilized for federal block grants as
defined by the Federal Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981 (P.L. 97-35) and any
subsequent amendments thereto, including federal block grants authorized after July 1,
1983, unless such block grant applications are in compliance with the applicable federal
and state laws, as well as the standards and criteria prescribed in KRS 45.353.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/9/2025 1:29 PM Jacketed